Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 2.1. Virginia Uniform Certificate of Title for Watercraft Act.
§ 29.1-733.16.
Termination statement; delivery of certificate of title; penalty.

A secured party indicated in the files of the Department as having a security interest in a watercraft shall deliver a termination statement to the Department and, on the debtor’s request, to the debtor by the earlier of:

Twenty days after the secured party receives a signed demand from an owner for a termination statement and there is no obligation secured by the watercraft subject to the security interest and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value secured by the watercraft; or

If the watercraft is consumer goods, 30 days after there is no obligation secured by the watercraft and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value secured by the watercraft.

If a written certificate of title has been created and delivered to a secured party and a termination statement is required under subsection A, the secured party, not later than the date required by subsection A, shall deliver the certificate to the debtor or to the Department with the statement. An owner, upon securing the release of any security interest upon a vessel shown upon the certificate of title issued for the watercraft, may exhibit the documents evidencing the release, signed by the person or persons making such release, and the certificate of title to the Department. If the certificate is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or is otherwise unavailable or illegible, the secured party shall deliver with the statement, not later than the date required by subsection A, an application for a replacement certificate meeting the requirements of §

29.1-733.22

.

On delivery to the Department of a termination statement authorized by the secured party, the security interest to which the statement relates ceases to be perfected. If the security interest to which the statement relates was indicated on the certificate of title, the Department shall create a new certificate and deliver the new certificate or a record evidencing an electronic certificate. The Department shall maintain in its files the date and time of delivery to the Department of the statement.

A secured party that fails to deliver a required termination statement is liable for any loss that the secured party had reason to know might result from its failure to comply and that could not reasonably have been prevented and for the cost of an application for a certificate of title under §

29.1-733.7

or

29.1-733.22

.

It shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor for a secured party who holds a certificate of title to refuse or fail to surrender the certificate to the owner or his agent within 10 days after the security interest has been paid and satisfied.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.17.
Transfer of ownership.

On voluntary transfer of an ownership interest in a watercraft covered by a certificate of title, the following rules apply:

If the certificate is a written certificate of title and the transferor’s interest is noted on the certificate, the transferor promptly shall sign the certificate and deliver it to the transferee. If the transferor does not have possession of the certificate, the person in possession of the certificate has a duty to facilitate the transferor’s compliance with this subdivision. A secured party does not have a duty to facilitate the transferor’s compliance with this subdivision if the proposed transfer is prohibited by the security agreement.

If the certificate of title is an electronic certificate of title, the transferor promptly shall sign and deliver to the transferee a record evidencing the transfer of ownership to the transferee.

The transferee has a right enforceable by specific performance to require the transferor comply with subdivision 1 or 2.

The creation of a certificate of title identifying the transferee as owner of record satisfies subsection A.

A failure to comply with subsection A or to apply for a new certificate of title does not render a transfer of ownership of a watercraft ineffective between the parties. Except as otherwise provided in §

29.1-733.18

,

29.1-733.19

,

29.1-733.23

, or

29.1-733.24

, a transfer of ownership without compliance with subsection A is not effective against another person claiming an interest in the watercraft.

A transferor that complies with subsection A is not liable as owner of the watercraft for an event occurring after the transfer, regardless of whether the transferee applies for a new certificate of title.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.18.
Effect of missing or incorrect information.

Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-337

, a certificate of title or other record required or authorized by this article is effective even if it contains incorrect information or does not contain required information.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.19.
Transfer of ownership by secured party’s transfer statement.

For the purpose of this section, “secured party’s transfer statement” means a record signed by the secured party of record stating:

A default on an obligation secured by the watercraft has occurred;

The secured party of record is exercising or has exercised post-default remedies with respect to the watercraft;

By reason of the exercise, the secured party of record has the right to transfer the ownership interest of an owner, and the name of the owner;

The name and last-known mailing address of the owner of record and the secured party of record;

The name of the transferee;

All other information required by subsection B of §

29.1-733.7

; and

One of the following:

The certificate of title is an electronic certificate;

The secured party does not have possession of the written certificate of title created in the name of the owner of record; or

The secured party is delivering the written certificate of title to the Department with the secured party’s transfer statement.

Unless the Department rejects a secured party’s transfer statement for a reason stated in subsection C of §

29.1-733.8

, not later than 20 days after delivery to the Department of the statement and payment of fees and taxes payable under the law of the Commonwealth other than this article in connection with the statement or the acquisition or use of the watercraft, the Department shall:

Accept the statement;

Amend the files of the Department to reflect the transfer; and

If the name of the owner whose ownership interest is being transferred is indicated on the certificate of title:

Cancel the certificate even if the certificate has not been delivered to the Department;

Create a new certificate indicating the transferee as owner; and

Deliver the new certificate or a record evidencing an electronic certificate.

An application under subsection A or the creation of a certificate of title under subsection B is not by itself a disposition of the watercraft and does not by itself relieve the secured party of its duties under Title 8.9A.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.20.
Transfer by operation of law.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“By operation of law” means pursuant to a law or judicial order affecting ownership of a watercraft:

Because of death, such as in the case of a legatee, distributee, or surviving joint owner;

Because of divorce or other family law proceeding;

Because of any written agreement ratified or incorporated in a decree or order of a court of record;

Because of merger, consolidation, dissolution, insolvency, or bankruptcy;

Because of an execution sale;

Through the exercise of the rights of a lien creditor or a person having a lien created by statute or rule of law, including a lien provided for in §

43-34

;

Through the execution of a statement of transfer on death; or

Through other legal process.“Transfer-by-law statement” means a record signed by a transferee stating that by operation of law the transferee has acquired or has the right to acquire an ownership interest in a watercraft.

A transfer-by-law statement shall contain:

The name and last-known mailing address of the owner of record and the transferee and the other information required by subsection B of §

29.1-733.7

;

Documentation sufficient to establish the transferee’s ownership interest or right to acquire the ownership interest;

A statement that:

The certificate of title is an electronic certificate of title;

The transferee does not have possession of the written certificate of title created in the name of the owner of record; or

The transferee is delivering the written certificate to the Department with the transfer-by-law statement;

Unless the Department rejects a transfer-by-law statement for a reason stated in subsection C of §

29.1-733.8

or because the statement does not include documentation or an estate statement satisfactory to the Department as to the transferee’s ownership interest or right to acquire the ownership interest, not later than 20 days after delivery to the Department of the transfer-by-law statement and payment of fees and taxes payable under the law of the Commonwealth other than this article in connection with the statement or with the acquisition or use of the watercraft, the Department shall:

Accept the statement;

Amend the files of the Department to reflect the transfer; and

If the name of the owner whose ownership interest is being transferred is indicated on the certificate of title:

Cancel the certificate even if the certificate has not been delivered to the Department;

Create a new certificate indicating the transferee as owner;

Indicate on the new certificate any security interest indicated on the canceled certificate, unless a court order provides otherwise; and

Deliver the new certificate or a record evidencing an electronic certificate.

This section does not apply to a transfer of an interest in a watercraft by a secured party under Part 6 (§

8.9A-601

et seq.) of Title 8.9A.

4.

Except for a transfer described in subdivision 1 of the definition of “by operation of law,” evidence that notification of the transfer and the intent to file the transfer-by-law statement has been sent to all persons indicated in the files of the Department as having an interest, including a security interest, in the watercraft; and

5.

If the owner is dead and no fiduciary has qualified for his estate, an estate statement to the effect that no qualification for the estate has been made, that no qualification is expected, and that the decedent’s debts have been paid or that the proceeds from the sale of the watercraft will be applied against his debts. The estate statement shall contain the name, residence at the time of death, and date of death of the decedent and the names of any other persons having an interest in the watercraft for which the transfer of title is sought. If these persons are of legal age, they shall signify in writing their consent to the transfer.

History.

2013, c. 787; 2019, c. 236.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 236, in subsection A, added subdivision 7 in the definition of
“By operation of law”; and made related stylistic changes.

Research References.

Research References. Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-401. Checklist for Probate and Administration.

§ 29.1-733.21.
Application for transfer of ownership or termination of security interest without certificate of title.

Except as otherwise provided in §

29.1-733.19

or

29.1-733.20

, if the Department receives, unaccompanied by a signed certificate of title, an application for a new certificate that includes an indication of a transfer of ownership or a termination statement, the Department shall create a new certificate under this section only if:

All other requirements under §§

29.1-733.7

and

29.1-733.8

are met;

The applicant provides an affidavit stating facts showing the applicant is entitled to a transfer of ownership or termination statement;

The applicant provides the Department with satisfactory evidence that notification of the application has been sent to the owner of record and all persons indicated in the files of the Department as having an interest, including a security interest, in the watercraft, at least 45 days have passed since the notification was sent, and the Department has not received an objection from any of those persons; and

The applicant submits any other information required by the Department as evidence of the applicant’s ownership or right to terminate the security interest, and the Department has no credible information indicating theft, fraud, or an undisclosed or unsatisfied security interest, lien, or other claim to an interest in the watercraft.

The Department shall indicate in a certificate of title created under subsection A that the certificate was created without submission of a signed certificate or termination statement. Unless credible information indicating theft, fraud, or an undisclosed or unsatisfied security interest, lien, or other claim to an interest in the watercraft is delivered to the Department not later than one year after creation of the certificate, on request in a form and manner required by the Department, the Department shall remove the indication from the certificate.

Unless the Department determines that the value of a watercraft is less than $5,000, before the Department creates a certificate of title under subsection A, the Department shall require the applicant to post a bond or provide an equivalent source of indemnity or security. The bond, indemnity, or other security shall not exceed twice the value of the watercraft as determined by the Department. The bond, indemnity, or other security shall be in a form required by the Department and provide for indemnification of any owner, purchaser, or other claimant for any expense, loss, delay, or damage, including reasonable attorney fees and costs, but not including incidental or consequential damages, resulting from creation or amendment of the certificate.

Unless the Department receives a claim for indemnity not later than one year after creation of a certificate of title under subsection A, on request in a form and manner required by the Department, the Department shall release any bond, indemnity, or other security.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.22.
Replacement certificate of title.

If a written certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or otherwise becomes unavailable or illegible, the secured party of record or, if no secured party is indicated in the files of the Department, the owner of record may apply for and, by furnishing information satisfactory to the Department, obtain a replacement certificate in the name of the owner of record.

An applicant for a replacement certificate of title shall sign the application and, except as otherwise permitted by the Department, the application shall comply with §

29.1-733.7

. The application shall include the existing certificate unless the certificate is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or otherwise unavailable.

A replacement certificate of title created by the Department shall comply with §

29.1-733.9

and indicate on the face of the certificate that it is a replacement certificate.

If a person receiving a replacement certificate of title subsequently obtains possession of the original written certificate, the person promptly shall destroy the original certificate of title.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.23.
Rights of purchaser other than secured party.

A buyer in ordinary course of business has the protections afforded by subsection (2) of §

8.2-403

and subsection (a) of §

8.9A-320

even if an existing certificate of title was not signed and delivered to the buyer or a new certificate listing the buyer as owner of record was not created.

Except as otherwise provided in §§

29.1-733.17

and

29.1-733.24

, the rights of a purchaser of a watercraft that is not a buyer in ordinary course of business or a lien creditor are governed by the Uniform Commercial Code.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.24.
Rights of secured party.

Subject to subsection B or C, the effect of perfection and nonperfection of a security interest and the priority of a perfected or unperfected security interest with respect to the rights of a purchaser or creditor, including a lien creditor, is governed by

Titles 8.1

A through 8.10.

A security interest perfected under this article has priority over any statutory lien on the watercraft, except for a mechanics lien for repairs to the extent of $150 given by §

43-33

if the requirements are met, provided the mechanic furnishes the holder of any such recorded lien who requests it with an itemized sworn statement of the work done and materials supplied for which the lien is claimed.

If, while a security interest in a watercraft is perfected by any method under this article, the Department creates a certificate of title that does not indicate that the watercraft is subject to the security interest or contain a statement that it may be subject to security interests not indicated on the certificate:

A buyer of the watercraft, other than a person in the business of selling or leasing watercraft of that kind, takes free of the security interest if the buyer, acting in good faith and without knowledge of the security interest, gives value and receives possession of the watercraft; and

The security interest is subordinate to a conflicting security interest in the watercraft that is perfected under §

29.1-733.15

after creation of the certificate and without the conflicting secured party’s knowledge of the security interest.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.25.
Acquiring title to an abandoned watercraft.

Any watercraft abandoned for a period exceeding 60 days is subject to the provisions of this section.

A landowner, his lessee, or his agent may acquire title to any watercraft abandoned on his land or the water immediately adjacent to his land. Acquisition of title, under the provisions of this section, divests any other person of any interest in the watercraft.

If a watercraft has a registration number assigned by the Commonwealth or any other state, or if there are other means of identifying the owner, the person desiring to acquire title shall make a good faith effort to secure the last-known address of all owners and lien holders. He shall notify each owner and lien holder by registered letter that if ownership is not claimed and the watercraft not removed within 30 days, he will apply for title to the watercraft in his name.

The person desiring to acquire title also shall place a notice, to appear for three consecutive issues, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city where the watercraft is located. The notice shall describe the watercraft, its location, and any identifying number or numbers. The notice shall state that if the watercraft is not claimed and removed within 30 days after the first day the notice was published, the person who has placed the notice shall apply to the Department for title to the watercraft.

At the end of the 30-day period, the person seeking to acquire the watercraft shall apply to the Department for title. The application shall be accompanied by the following: (i) an affidavit stating that to the best of the applicant’s knowledge the watercraft has been abandoned for a period of at least 60 days; (ii) proof that the registered letter required by the Department was mailed at least 30 days prior to application or a detailed explanation of the steps taken to identify the owner and lien holder; and (iii) proof that a notice was printed in a newspaper as required in subsection D.

Upon receipt by the Department of all items required by subsection E, and after all fees and taxes due have been paid, the Department shall then issue title to the watercraft to the applicant.

All costs incurred in obtaining title to a watercraft under this section shall be borne by the applicant.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.26.
Duties and operation of the Department.

The Department shall retain the evidence used to establish the accuracy of the information in its files relating to the current ownership of a watercraft and the information on the certificate of title.

The Department shall retain in its files all information regarding a security interest in a watercraft for at least 10 years after the Department receives a termination statement regarding the security interest. The information shall be accessible by the hull identification number for the watercraft and any other methods provided by the Department.

If a person submits a record to the Department, or submits information that is accepted by the Department, and requests an acknowledgment of the filing or submission, the Department shall send to the person an acknowledgment showing the hull identification number of the watercraft to which the record or submission relates, the information in the filed record or submission, and the date and time the record was received or the submission accepted. A request under this section shall contain the hull identification number and be delivered by means authorized by the Department.

The Department shall send or otherwise make available in a record the following information to any person that requests it and pays the applicable fee:

Whether the files of the Department indicate, as of a date and time specified by the Department, but not a date earlier than three days before the Department received the request, any certificate of title, security interest, termination statement, or title brand that relates to a watercraft:

Identified by a hull identification number designated in the request;

Identified by a registration number designated in the request; or

Owned by a person designated in the request;

In responding to a request under this section, the Department shall provide the requested information in any medium. On request, the Department shall send the requested information in a record that is self-authenticating.

Employees of the Department are authorized to administer oaths and take acknowledgments and affidavits incidental to the administration and enforcement of this article. They shall receive no compensation for these services.

2.

With respect to the watercraft:

a.

The name and address of any owner as indicated in the files of the Department or on the certificate of title;

b.

The name and address of any secured party as indicated in the files of the Department or on the certificate, and the effective date of the information; and

c.

A copy of any termination statement indicated in the files of the Department and the effective date of the termination statement; and

3.

With respect to the watercraft, a copy of any certificate of origin, secured party transfer statement, transfer by law statement under §

29.1-733.20

, and other evidence of previous or current transfers of ownership.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.27.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.28.
Relationship to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This article modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

History.

2013, c. 787.

§ 29.1-733.29.
Savings clause.

The rights, duties, and interests flowing from a transaction, certificate of title, or record shall remain valid on and after July 1, 2014, if the transaction, certificate of title, or record:

Relates to a watercraft;

Was validly entered into or created before July 1, 2014; and

Would be subject to this article if it had been entered into or created on or after July 1, 2014.

This article does not affect an action or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2014.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection D, a security interest that is enforceable immediately before July 1, 2014, and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time is a perfected security interest under this article.

A security interest perfected immediately before July 1, 2014, remains perfected until the earlier of:

The time perfection would have ceased under the law under which the security interest was perfected; or

Three years after July 1, 2014.

This article does not affect the priority of a security interest in a watercraft if immediately before July 1, 2014, the security interest is enforceable and perfected, and that priority is established.

History.

2013, c. 787.